Mississippi, session 2026, SB2780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Short title.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Captain Justin James Whipps Correctional Safety and Wellness Act." SECTION 2.  Legislative findings and purpose. The Legislature finds that: (a)  The safety of correctional officers, staff, inmates, and the public is a compelling state interest. (b)  Workplace violence within correctional facilities poses a serious threat to life, morale, and institutional integrity. (c)  Proactive safety screening, mental health support, and leadership development reduce conflict, misconduct, and violence. (d)  The State of Mississippi has a duty to provide safe working conditions for correctional employees. (e)  The purpose of this act is to: (i)  Prevent the introduction of unauthorized weapons into correctional facilities by employees; (ii)  Promote mental well-being, emotional regulation, and professional leadership among correctional staff; and (ii)  Reduce incidents of violence, retaliation, and fatal conflict within correctional institutions. SECTION 3.  Mandatory employee weapons screening.  (1)  All state-operated and privately operated correctional facilities within the State of Mississippi shall implement mandatory weapons screening procedures for all employees, contractors, and volunteers entering secure areas of the facility. (2)  Screening shall include, but not be limited to: (a)  Walk-through or handheld metal detection upon entry; (b)  Bag and personal item inspections consistent with constitutional standards; and (c)  Randomized secondary screening as determined by facility administration. (3)  Screening procedures shall apply equally to all staff regardless of rank, seniority, or position. SECTION 4.  Employee vehicle weapons inspections. (1)  Each correctional facility shall establish a policy for random and reasonable inspection of employee vehicles parked on correctional property. (2)  Inspections shall be: (a)  Conducted pursuant to written policy; (b)  Nondiscriminatory in application; and (c)  Limited to ensuring the absence of unauthorized weapons or contraband. (3)  Refusal to comply with lawful inspection under this section may result in administrative discipline, including suspension or termination, consistent with due process protections. SECTION 5.  Mental well-being and wellness training.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Corrections (MDOC) shall require annual mental health and wellness training for all correctional officers and supervisory personnel. (2)  Training shall include: (a)  Stress management and trauma-informed practices; (b)  Conflict de-escalation techniques; (c)  Emotional regulation and impulse control; (d)  Peer support and early intervention strategies; and (e)  Resources for confidential mental health support. (3)  Completion of such training shall be a condition of continued employment. SECTION 6.  Leadership development and conflict reduction training.  (1)  All supervisory and command-level correctional staff shall complete annual leadership development training. (2)  Training shall address: (a)  Ethical leadership and accountability; (b)  Managing conflict among staff; (c)  Preventing retaliation and abuse of authority; (d)  Professional communication and decision-making under stress; and (e)  Creating a culture of safety and respect. (3)  Failure to complete required leadership training shall result in administrative review and corrective action. SECTION 7.  Enforcement and oversight. (1)  The Mississippi Department of Corrections (MDOC) shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this act. (2)  MDOC shall submit an annual report to the Legislature detailing: (a)  Compliance with screening and training requirements; (b)  Reported incidents of staff-on-staff violence; (c)  Disciplinary actions related to weapons violations; and (d)  Recommendations for improvement. SECTION 8.  Applicability.  This act shall apply to: (a)  All state-operated correctional facilities; and (b)  All private correctional facilities operating under contract with the State of Mississippi. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.